Illinois, session 104th, HB2562.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Guardianship and Advocacy Act is amended by 5changing Section 33.5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3955/33.5)7    Sec. 33.5. Guardianship training program. The State 8Guardian shall provide a training program that outlines the 9duties and responsibilities of guardians appointed under 10Article XIa of the Probate Act of 1975. The training program 11shall be offered to courts at no cost, and shall outline the 12responsibilities of a guardian and the rights of a person 13under with a disability in a guardianship proceeding under 14Article XIa of the Probate Act of 1975. The training program 15shall have 2 components: one for guardians of the person and 16another for guardians of the estate. The State Guardian shall 17determine the content of the training. The component for 18guardians of the person shall also include content regarding 19Alzheimer's disease and dementia, including, but not limited 20to, the following topics: effective communication strategies; 21best practices for interacting with people living with 22Alzheimer's disease or related forms of dementia; and 23strategies for supporting people living with Alzheimer's   HB2562 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08064 JRC 18110 b1disease or related forms of dementia in exercising their 2rights. In developing the training program content, the State 3Guardian shall consult with the courts, State and national 4guardianship organizations, public guardians, advocacy 5organizations, and persons and family members with direct 6experience with adult guardianship. In the preparation and 7dissemination of training materials, the State Guardian shall 8give due consideration to making the training materials 9accessible to persons with disabilities.10(Source: P.A. 103-64, eff. 1-1-24.) 11    Section 10. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 12Section 11a-12 as follows: 13    (755 ILCS 5/11a-12)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-12)14    Sec. 11a-12. Order of appointment.15    (a) If basis for the appointment of a guardian as 16specified in Section 11a-3 is not found, the court shall 17dismiss the petition.18    (b) If the respondent is adjudged to be a person with a 19disability and to lack some but not all of the capacity as 20specified in Section 11a-3, and if the court finds that 21guardianship is necessary for the protection of the person 22with a disability, his or her estate, or both, the court shall 23appoint a limited guardian for the respondent's person or 24estate or both. The court shall enter a written order stating   HB2562 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08064 JRC 18110 b1the factual basis for its findings and specifying the duties 2and powers of the guardian and the legal disabilities to which 3the respondent is subject.4    (c) If the respondent is adjudged to be a person with a 5disability and to be totally without capacity as specified in 6Section 11a-3, and if the court finds that limited 7guardianship will not provide sufficient protection for the 8person with a disability, his or her estate, or both, the court 9shall appoint a plenary guardian for the respondent's person 10or estate or both. The court shall enter a written order 11stating the factual basis for its findings.12    (d) The selection of the guardian shall be in the 13discretion of the court, which shall give due consideration to 14the preference of the person with a disability as to a 15guardian, as well as the qualifications of the proposed 16guardian, in making its appointment. However, the paramount 17concern in the selection of the guardian is the best interests 18and well-being of the person with a disability.19    One person or agency may be appointed a limited or plenary 20guardian of the person and another person or corporate trustee 21appointed as a limited or plenary guardian of the estate. If 22different persons are appointed, the court shall consider the 23factors set forth in subsection (b-5) of Section 11a-5. The 24court shall enter a written order stating the factual basis 25for its findings. 26    (e) The order of appointment of a guardian of the person   HB2562 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08064 JRC 18110 b1shall include the requirement that the guardian of the person 2complete the training program as provided in Section 33.5 of 3the Guardianship and Advocacy Act that outlines the 4responsibilities of the guardian of the person and the rights 5of the person under guardianship and file with the court a 6certificate of completion within one year from the date of 7issuance of the letters of guardianship, except that: (1) the 8chief judge of any circuit may order implementation of another 9training program by a suitable provider containing 10substantially similar content; (2) employees of the Office of 11the State Guardian, public guardians, attorneys currently 12authorized to practice law, corporate fiduciaries, and persons 13certified by the Center for Guardianship Certification are 14exempt from this training requirement; and (3) the court may, 15for good cause shown, exempt from this requirement an 16individual not otherwise listed in item (2). For the purposes 17of this subsection (e), good cause may be proven by affidavit. 18If the court finds good cause to exempt an individual from the 19training requirement, the order of appointment shall so state. 20(Source: P.A. 102-72, eff. 1-1-22; 102-770, eff. 1-1-23.)